Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3613
Interstate commission; duty and power.

The interstate commission shall have the duty and power to:

(a) Oversee and maintain the administration of the Interstate Medical Licensure Compact;

(b) Promulgate rules which shall be binding to the extent and in the manner provided for in the compact;

(c) Issue, upon the request of a member state or member board, advisory opinions concerning the meaning or interpretation of the compact, its bylaws, rules, and actions;

(d) Enforce compliance with compact provisions, the rules promulgated by the interstate commission, and the bylaws, using all necessary and proper means, including, but not limited to, the use of judicial process;

(e) Establish and appoint committees including, but not limited to, an executive committee as required by section 38-3612, which shall have the power to act on behalf of the interstate commission in carrying out its powers and duties;

(f) Pay, or provide for the payment of, the expenses related to the establishment, organization, and ongoing activities of the interstate commission;

(g) Establish and maintain one or more offices;

(h) Borrow, accept, hire, or contract for services of personnel;

(i) Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;

(j) Employ an executive director who shall have such powers to employ, select or appoint employees, agents, or consultants, and to determine their qualifications, define their duties, and fix their compensation;

(k) Establish personnel policies and programs relating to conflicts of interest, rates of compensation, and qualifications of personnel;

(l) Accept donations and grants of money, equipment, supplies, materials and services, and to receive, utilize, and dispose of it in a manner consistent with the conflict of interest policies established by the interstate commission;

(m) Lease, purchase, accept contributions or donations of, or otherwise to own, hold, improve or use, any property, real, personal, or mixed;

(n) Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon, or otherwise dispose of any property, real, personal, or mixed;

(o) Establish a budget and make expenditures;

(p) Adopt a seal and bylaws governing the management and operation of the interstate commission;

(q) Report annually to the legislatures and governors of the member states concerning the activities of the interstate commission during the preceding year. Such reports shall also include reports of financial audits and any recommendations that may have been adopted by the interstate commission;

(r) Coordinate education, training, and public awareness regarding the compact, its implementation, and its operation;

(s) Maintain records in accordance with the bylaws;

(t) Seek and obtain trademarks, copyrights, and patents; and

(u) Perform such functions as may be necessary or appropriate to achieve the purposes of the compact.

Laws 2017, LB88, § 13.